Nebraska, session 109, LB962.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act:
(1) Community-based provider means a nonprofit or local governmental
entity contracting with the Department of Health and Human Services, the Office
of Juvenile Services, or the Office of Probation Administration to deliver
services for youth transitioning from congregate care placements or probation
supervision, including mentoring and employment support;
(2) Credible messenger means an individual who has lived experience in the
justice or foster care system and who is trained in mentorship and restorative
justice practices;
(3) Facility means a juvenile detention facility, group home, residential
treatment facility, or a youth rehabilitation and treatment center;
(4) Individualized employment plan means an age-appropriate, customized
career plan that:
(a) Is developed collaboratively by a counselor employed by the State
Department of Education, the youth, and a representative of a facility or the
Office of Probation Administration, as appropriate; and
(b) Identifies employment, credentialing, and job placement steps for the
youth;
(5) Transition plan means a written, individualized plan developed as
described in section 5 of this act; and
(6) Youth means any individual under nineteen years of age who is exiting
or transitioning from a congregate care placement, including at a facility or
residential treatment program, or who is transitioning from probation
supervision.
Sec. 3. (1) The purpose of the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act
is to ensure youth in congregate care placements receive essential support for
successful transition back into their homes and communities.
(2) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Youth and families require intensive support to assist in planning,
supervision, and support during the transition phase; and
(b) Planning for discharge upon entry to a facility is the best practice
to ensure a successful re-entry.
Sec. 4. (1)(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, the Office of
Juvenile Services, the Office of Probation Administration, and the State
Department of Education shall collaboratively establish the Youth Reentry and
Transitional Support Program.
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall be responsible for
supervision and programming for youth placed in the care, custody, and control
of the department by court order pursuant to the Nebraska Juvenile Code. The
Office of Probation Administration shall be responsible for supervision and
programming for youth placed under probation supervision by court order
pursuant to the Nebraska Juvenile Code.
(2) The Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Program shall provide for
the following for each youth:
(a) Completion of a transition plan;
(b) Regular reviews of each youth's transition plan. These reviews shall
be accomplished by a representative of the facility or the Office of Probation
Administration, as appropriate, and shall occur weekly for detention or other
short-term placements and monthly for all other placements, including placement
at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center; and
(c) Supervision following re-entry by the Department of Health and Human
Services, the Office of Juvenile Services, or the Office of Probation
Administration, as appropriate, to ensure a successful transition.
Sec. 5. (1) A transition plan shall be developed for each youth upon
admission to a facility or admission to another congregate care placement or
probation supervision.
(2) The transition plan shall be developed using validated assessment
instruments, screenings, and evaluations. The transition plan shall be
developed collaboratively with involvement from the youth, the youth's family
or guardian, and facility representatives and the Department of Health and
Human Services, the Office of Juvenile Services, or the Office of Probation
Administration, as appropriate. When possible, development of the plan should
include coordinating with local family resource centers, community-based
providers, or other community resources in order to support the youth and the
youth's family and identify long-term supports.
(3) A transition plan shall include provisions regarding:
(a) Treatment services, including continuity of behavioral health,
-1-

LB962 LB962
2026 2026
medical, and medicaid services;
(b) Enrolling eligible youth in programs and services offered by the State
Department of Education;
(c) Developing an individualized employment plan identifying career and
training pathways for youth obtaining employment upon reentry;
(d) Services from community-based providers, including credible messenger
mentoring or in-home supportive or behavioral health services;
(e) Coordinating with family resource centers to align family and
community support;
(f) A housing stabilization strategy and safe placement;
(g) A school reentry or educational advancement plan;
(h) Assisting youth in applying for medicaid benefits and maintaining
eligibility;
(i) Plans and processes to obtain identification documents and public
benefits; and
(j) Family engagement and restorative justice objectives consistent with
reforms enacted in Laws 2023, LB50.
(4) During the first ninety days following a youth's re-entry, a family
team meeting shall be held at least once every thirty days. Such meeting shall
include the youth and the youth's family or guardian and the Department of
Health and Human Services, the Office of Juvenile Services, or the Office of
Probation Administration, as appropriate.
(5) Youth who are eligible for participation in the bridge to independence
program as provided in the Young Adult Bridge to Independence Act shall be
referred to that program. Services under the Youth Reentry and Transitional
Support Act shall not duplicate services available under the bridge to
independence program.
Sec. 6. (1) Each participating agency shall implement the Youth Reentry
and Transitional Support Act within its existing duties, staff, and
appropriations.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services and Office of Juvenile
Services shall integrate transition planning into its existing case management,
child welfare, and medicaid resources to support services under the act.
(3) The Office of Probation Administration shall integrate transition
planning into probation supervision and existing community-based programs.
(4) The State Department of Education shall deliver vocational
rehabilitation and employment services through existing federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act and pre-employment transition services funding
or other existing federal funds.
(5) The Department of Labor may assist with workforce placement and
apprenticeships using existing programs.
(6) Community-based organizations may partner with participating agencies
through existing grants, contracts, or volunteer programs without additional
state appropriations.
(7) No new General Fund appropriation is authorized under the Youth
Reentry and Transitional Support Act. All participating agencies shall absorb
any costs incurred using current appropriations or available federal,
philanthropic, or reallocated funds.
Sec. 7. Nothing in the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act shall
be construed to require:
(1) The Office of Probation Administration to provide services to a youth
after a term of probation has ended; or
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services or Office of Juvenile
Services to provide services to a youth after the youth has left the care,
custody, and control of the department.
Sec. 8. The Department of Health and Human Services, the Office of
Juvenile Services, the Office of Probation Administration, the State Board of
Education, and the Department of Labor may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations that provide for:
(1) Defining joint responsibilities in implementing the Youth Reentry and
Transitional Support Act; and
(2) Setting minimum training standards for credible messengers and staff
responsible for implementing the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act.
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on December 1, 2026.
-2-